Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB213.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 75A10(a) and (b)(1) of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 75A10. Confidential communications involving emergency responders.(a) Disclosure.--Except as provided under subsection (b), a trained peer support provider or coparticipant present during peer support services, a health care provider or a helpline operator may not disclose any information regarding an emergency responder without the consent of the emergency responder.(b) Exceptions.--The privilege established under subsection (a) shall not apply if any of the following apply:123456789101112131415161718 (1) The trained peer support provider, health care provider or helpline operator reasonably believes a clear and present danger exists to the emergency responder or to other individuals.* * *Section 2. Title 35 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 75A12. Mental health evaluations for 911 dispatchers.(a) Evaluations.--Without cost to the 911 dispatcher , an employer shall provide a 911 dispatcher with a mental health evaluation for post-traumatic stress disorder by a licensed health care provider:(1) upon request of the 911 dispatcher ; or (2) upon recommendation of the direct supervisor of the 911 dispatcher . (b) Treatment.--If a licensed health care provider determines during the mental health evaluation under subsection (a) that the 911 dispatcher has symptoms of post-traumatic stress disorder, the 911 dispatcher shall be provided with treatment under a licensed health care provider's care until the licensed health care provider determines in writing that the 911 dispatcher is able to resume full duties. (c) Administrative duty.--A 911 dispatcher shall be assigned to administrative duty if the 911 dispatcher is experiencing symptoms of post-traumatic stress disorder as determined by a licensed health care provider under subsection (a) and whom the licensed health care provider has not yet determined is able to resume full duties under subsection (b).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0213PN0160 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728